src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # Phonological rules for Kven

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fkv/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! We first define alphabets and sets. Thereafter come the rules.

!! ## Alphabets and sets

!! ### Alphabet
Alphabet

!! #### The letters
a b c d đ ð e f g h i j k l m n o p q         !!≈ * @CODE@
r s t u ü v w x y z å ä ö æ ø š             !!≈ * @CODE@
A B C D Đ Ð E F G H I J K L M N O P           !!≈ * @CODE@
R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Æ Ø Š               !!≈ * @CODE@

!! #### The archiphonemes
%^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y                !!≈ * **@CODE@** archi vowels for harmony
%^V %^N:n                        !!≈ * **@CODE@** vowel copy sanoo, LNR copy purra

!! #### Letters with deviant behaviour
i2:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = plural i of nouns
i3:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = past tense i of verbs
i4:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = i in conditional isi of most verbs (without gemination)
i5:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = superlative i of adjectives
i6:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = i:j in poika:pojan
i7:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = i in conditional of contract verbs (with gemination)
p2:p t2:t k2:k            !!≈ * **@CODE@** p2, k2, t2 = always p, t, k ; eli ei tule astevaihtelua
t3:t                      !!≈ * **@CODE@** t3 = gradation but not t:s (implemented?)
t4:t                      !!≈ * **@CODE@** t4 = always p, t, k ; eli ei tule astevaihtelua eikä geminaatio (täytyy)
k3:k                      !!≈ * **@CODE@** k3 never k:v, contrary to k

!! #### Triggers
%^HMETA:0                 !!≈ * **@CODE@** h metateesi sykshyyn
%^WG:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** weak grade hatun
%^TJ:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** vuote vuoje
%^T0:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** tytär tyär tytärtä tyärtä in Var
%^UU:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** vuote vuue
%^E2I:0                   !!≈ * **@CODE@** e to i in nom ove : ovi
%^A2I:0                   !!≈ * **@CODE@** a to i in opettajine (Var)
%^VDEL:0 %^EDEL:0         !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- DEL = deletion
%^AE:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- a to e lauletaan, soma somempi
%^AO:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- a to o sanoissa
%^A0:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- a to 0
%^I0:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- i to 0 in vanha_x_21 -Por with i endings: tooline
%^E0:0                    !!≈ * **@CODE@** e to 0 in vanha_a_32 and vanha_n_32 bc we add b4 dial trigger, for twolc struc.
%^End:0                   !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- End of word, since the # tags don't work properly
%^¤:0               !!≈ * **@CODE@** -

!! #### Dialect tags
%^Por:0                   !!≈ * **@CODE@** -f- Porsanger  dialekti
%^Var:0                   !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- Varanger   dialekti
%^Jok:0                   !!≈ * **@CODE@** -- Jokivarret dialekti

! *** Remember to add new tags to Dummy further down!
!%^n_23-e2i:0          ! Not in dummy

!! ### Literal quotes and angles 
!! Thesemust be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     !! * »7 represents the quotation mark »
 «7     !! * «7 represents the quotation mark «
 %[%>%] !! * %[%>%] >
 %[%<%] !! * %[%<%] <
 »  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Derivational suffix
%>  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = border before inflection suffix
 #  !! * The hash mark = Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ !!≈ * **@CODE@** = (exceptional) soft hyphenation point 

;


!! ### Sets
Sets
FrontVow = e i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 y ä ö ü æ ø 
           E I                   Y Ä Ö Ü Æ Ø ;            !!≈ * @CODE@
BackVow = a o u å 
          A O U Å ;                                       !!≈ * @CODE@
ArchiVow =  %^A %^O %^U ;                                 !!≈ * @CODE@
UnroundedVow = e ä a i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 
               E Ä A I ;                                  !!≈ * @CODE@
RoundedVow = y ö u o 
             Y Ö U O ;                                    !!≈ * @CODE@
SomeVow = %^V ;                                           !!≈ * @CODE@
NeutralVow = e i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 
             E I ;                                        !!≈ * @CODE@
Vow   = FrontVow BackVow ArchiVow SomeVow ;               !!≈ * @CODE@
NotE    =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 y ä ö ü æ ø a o u å ;       !!≈ * @CODE@
NotEY   =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7   ä ö   æ ø a o u å ;       !!≈ * @CODE@
NotEYU  =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7   ä ö   æ ø a o   å ;       !!≈ * @CODE@
NotOU   = e i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 y ä ö ü æ ø a ;             !!≈ * @CODE@
NotOUI  = e                     y ä ö ü æ ø a ;             !!≈ * @CODE@
NotOUIY = e                       ä ö   æ ø a ;             !!≈ * @CODE@
NotAEI  =                       y ä ö ü æ ø   o u å ;       !!≈ * @CODE@
NotOUIF =                      y ä ö ü æ ø   ;              !!≈ * @CODE@ and e? (removed 29.1.)
NotOUIB =                                  a ;              !!≈ * @CODE@ and e? (removed 29.1.)
NotEYUF =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7   ä ö   æ ø         ;       !!≈ * @CODE@
NotEYUB =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7             a o   å ;       !!≈ * @CODE@
LNRM     = l n r m ;                                        !!≈ * @CODE@
ArchiCns = %^N ;                                            !!≈ * @CODE@
SurfaceCns = b c d đ f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x z 
             B C D Đ F G H J K L M N P Q R S Š T V W X Z ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
Cns = SurfaceCns ArchiCns p2 t2 k2 ;                        !!≈ * @CODE@
Segment = Vow Cns ;                                       !!≈ * @CODE@
Dummy = %^WG %^T0 %^TJ %^UU %^E2I %^A2I %^HMETA %^VDEL %^EDEL %^AE %^AO %^¤ %^I0 %^E0 %^A0 %^Por %^Var %^Jok ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
DummyBorder = Dummy %> ;          !!≈ * @CODE@
Dial =  %^Por %^Var %^Jok ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
NonFront = BackVow ArchiVow ArchiCns SomeVow Cns NeutralVow Dummy %> ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
NE = %> n e ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
EÄA = e %^A ;  !!≈ * @CODE@

!! Development principles:
!! --- NO UNCLEAR SEQUENCES WITHOUT AN EXPLANATION (and TESTS): (Cns:*) :Cns+ Cns:* (:Cns)
!! --- One TRIGGER, one change! No ^AO that means a:o and a:0 and a:i, then 3 DIFFERENT triggers

!! ### Trigger order 
!! (to be completed). The triggers should be in this order both in lexc and here in twolc.

!! `stem  Dial:  WG  {T0,TJ}  {E0,I0,E2I,A2I,AO,AE,VDEL,UU}  HMETA  >  {i2:,i3:,i4:](i5:}  >  suffixes`

!! # Rules 
!! (Divided into consonant and vowel rules)
Rules

! ===============
!! ## Consonant rules
! ===============


!! ### Gemination rules

!! Pitkän vokaalin jälkeen ja kans painottoman tavun jälkeen k, t, p ja s geminoituvat
!! ko perässä on pitkä vokaali (= lounaismurteitten erikoisgeminaatio),
!! mutta muut konsonantit geminoituvat vaan lyhyen painollisen tavun jälkeen
!! (= yleisgeminaatio). (ES).

"Gemination 0:h"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
0:h <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ ä %> :ä ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ ö %> :ö ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ y %> :y ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ u %> [:u|i2: (%> n) #] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ e %> :e ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ :o (Dial:) [ %> :o | (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) # ] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ :o (Dial:)           (%^AO:0) %> i5: %> [m|n] ; !superlatiivi
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ :a (Dial:0) %> :a ; ! for kuvvaa Dialects could be just %^Por:0
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ [ä:|(e:)] (Dial:) (%^E2I:0) %> :i (%>) :i ; ! pyhä:pyhhii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ ä: %> i5: i %> [n|m] ; ! superl. pyhhiimässä
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _  a:i (Dial:) (%^A2I:0) %> :i ; ! kuva kuvvii ! used2be just (Dummy:0) after a:i

"Gemination 0:j"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
0:j <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ ä: (Dial:) %> [:ä | i2:i %> :i ]      ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ ö  %> :ö                              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ y  %> :y                              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ e  %> :e                              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ i (%^AO:) %> :i (%> n) #              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ u  %> [:u|i2: (%> n) #]               ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ u  %>     i5:  %> [m|n]               ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ :a   (Dial:0)  %> :a                  ; ! for kuvvaa d. could be just %^Por:0
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ :o   (Dial:) [ %> :o | (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) # ] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ :o   (Dial:)           (%^AO:0) %> i5: %> [m|n]   ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ (e:) (Dial:) (%^E2I:0) %> :i %> :i    ; ! kivvii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _  a:i (Dial:) (%^A2I:0) %> :i         ; ! kuva kuvvii !
      !  [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] j _ :ä (Dial:) %> :ä  ; !Må ikke gi lämpim^A>mp^A>^A -> lämpimä>mpä>ä
      !  [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] j _ :a (Dial:) %> :a ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :Vow (Dial:) %>  i7: ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :i   (Dial:) %>  %^V:i ; ! Added ^V:i instead of just :i. Used2Be [ %^V:i - i7: ]
                               ![l|r|n|m] :j _ e:  (Dial:) %^E2I:0 %> i2: %>   %^V: ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _  i   (Dial:) %> i2: %> t %^A: ; ! meininkkiitä in Por
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :ö (Dial:) %> :ö ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :y (Dial:) %> :y ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :u (Dial:) %> :u ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :o (Dial:) %> :o ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :e (Dial:) %> :e ;
